Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 4301, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4301. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Oklahoma Quality Events Incentive Act" and shall be in effect
through June 30, 2026 2032.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 1065 Page 1

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1065 Page 2